Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB595.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Behavioral Health and Physical Health Services Integration.--(a) The department shall integrate into the HealthChoices medical assistance managed care program the following services for medical assistance-eligible persons:(1) Behavioral health services, including all mental health and addiction services covered by medical assistance.(2) Physical health services covered by medical assistance.(3) All medication and specialty pharmacy drug benefits covered by medical assistance.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The department shall implement the integrated medical assistance managed care program by contracting with managed care organizations in a manner that:(1) Ensures that each recipient receives high quality, comprehensive health care services in the recipient's local community within the least restrictive setting able to support the recipient's needs.(2) Develops strategies to address social determinants of health.(3) Provides optimal information exchange to support whole-person care delivery.(4) Provides for budget stability and predictability through defined outcomes, performance and accountability. (5) Balances the need for quality health care services, patient satisfaction, prudent financial measures and self- sufficiency.(6) Ensures the most efficient and cost-effective health care services, administrative systems and structures.(7) Provides for a sustainable and uniform delivery system across the Commonwealth's departments and agencies.(8) Offers health care services to assist recipients in attaining independence or self-care.(c) The department shall submit the appropriate waiver proposal to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for approval of an amendment to the existing PA 67 waiver under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(b) (relating to compliance with State plan and payment provisions) . The department shall submit for approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services the appropriate waiver to integrate physical and behavioral health services by October 1, 2025 . The department shall: 20250HB0595PN0603 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Provide medical assistance integrated benefits through the most effective model of medical assistance capitated managed care as determined by the department.(2) Require mandatory participation in a medical assistance capitated managed care program for all persons eligible for medical assistance.(3) Utilize the procurement process under 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code) for the integrated program.(d) As used in this section, the term "behavioral health services" means mental disorders and substance-related and addictive disorders. The term does not include intellectual developmental disorders.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0595PN0603 - 3 - 1234567891011121314